New York, session 2025-2026, A5807.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The metropolitan transportation authority is hereby 2 directed to examine, evaluate and make recommendations relating to: 3 (a) designating and determining those structures and storage areas 4 under the elevated train tracks of such authority, which may pose a 5 hazard to the facilities, infrastructure and commuters of the metropol- 6 itan transportation authority; and 7 (b) the use and effectiveness of the commuter notification system, 8 operated by the authority, in providing timely notifications to commu- 9 ters of hazards, emergencies and changes in the provision of transporta- 10 tion and service. 11 § 2. The metropolitan transportation authority shall, within 1 year of 12 the effective date of this act, submit to the governor and the legisla- 13 ture, a report of its findings, conclusions and recommendations. Any 14 information that may be deemed classified may be omitted from the final, 15 published report at the discretion of the chair of the metropolitan 16 transportation authority. 17 § 3. All costs of implementing the provisions of this act shall be 18 borne by the metropolitan transportation authority. 19 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06050-01-5